Washington statutes.
RCW 19.250.050

Violations—Penalties—Attorney general may enforce—Limitation of liability.

(1) Every knowing violation of RCW 19.250.010 is punishable by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars and no more than fifty thousand dollars for each violation.

(2) Including a wireless phone number in a directory without a subscriber's express, opt-in consent pursuant to RCW 19.250.020 is a violation of this chapter and is punishable by a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars unless the directory provider first conducted a reasonable investigation as required in RCW 19.250.020 and was unable to determine if the published number was a wireless phone number.

(3) Failure to remove a wireless phone number from a directory of any form within a reasonable period of time as required in RCW 19.250.030 is a violation of this chapter and is punishable by a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars.

(4) The attorney general may bring actions to enforce compliance with this section. For the first violation by any company, organization, or person under this chapter, the attorney general may notify the company, organization, or person with a letter of warning that this chapter has been violated.

(5) A telecommunications company or directory provider, or any official or employee of a telecommunications company or directory provider, is not subject to criminal or civil liability for the release of customer information as authorized by this chapter.

[ 2009 c 401 s 4; 2008 c 271 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 271: See note following RCW 19.250.005.